Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2912
Contractor; false affidavit; penalties.

Any contractor
who knowingly provides a false affidavit under section 48-2911 to the state
or political subdivision shall be subject to the penalties of perjury and
upon a second or subsequent violation shall be barred from contracting with
the state or any political subdivision for a period of three years after the
date of discovery of the falsehood.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 12.

Perjury, penalty, see section 28-915.